test/src/morphology/V-laskma84_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `laskma: # Verb (84) `laskma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `laskma+V+Inf/mA: `laskma
     `laskma+V+Inf: `laskõq
     `laskma+V+ActPrtPrc: `lasknuq
     `laskma+V+PssPrtPrc: last
     `laskma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: lasõ
     `laskma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: lask
     `laskma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [lasi, `lasksõ]
     `laskma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [lasù, `lasksõ]
